Utah statutes.
16-6a-708.   Meetings by telecommunication.

(1)  Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, any or all of the members may participate in an annual, regular, or special meeting of the members by, or the meeting may be conducted through the use of, any means of communication by which all persons participating in the meeting may hear each other during the meeting.

(2)  A member participating in a meeting by a means permitted under Subsection (1) is considered to be present in person at the meeting.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

